src/fst/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL

:	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS ;

:	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT

:	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS ;

:	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN ;

:	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_CLIT ;

:	# ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN

+Px3:%>än	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT

:	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS ;

:	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN ;

:	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_CLIT ;

:	# ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_SG_NOM

+Sg+Nom:	# ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_SINGULARS

+Pl+Nom:%>t	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Abe:%>ttä	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Sg+Abl:%>ltä	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Sg+Ade:%>llä	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Sg+All:%>lle	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT ;

+Sg+Ela:%>stä	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Sg+Ess:%>nä	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Sg+Gen:%>n	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ine:%>ssä	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Sg+Nom:%>	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS ;

+Sg+Nom:%>	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_CLIT ;

+Sg+Tra:%>kse	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL ;

+Sg+Tra:%>ksi	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS

+Pl+Abe:%>i%>ttä	PROPN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Pl+Abl:%>i%>ltä	PROPN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ade:%>i%>llä	PROPN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Pl+All:%>i%>lle	PROPN_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ela:%>i%>stä	PROPN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ine:%>i%>ssä	PROPN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ins:%>i%>n	PROPN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Tra:%>i%>kse	PROPN_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL ;

+Pl+Tra:%>i%>ksi	PROPN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT

:	PROPN_FRONT_POSS ;

:	PROPN_FRONT_POSS_EN ;

:	PROPN_FRONT_CLIT ;

:	# ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT

:	PROPN_FRONT_POSS ;

:	PROPN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN ;

:	PROPN_FRONT_CLIT ;

:	# ;



LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_PLURALS

:	PROPN_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;

:	PROPN_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;


LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_PLNOM_POSS

+Pl+Nom:	PROPN_FRONT_POSS ;


LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_PLNOM_ARCHAIC_CLIT

+Pl+Nom+Use/Arch:%>t	PROPN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_PLNOM_ARCHAIC_POSS

+Pl+Nom+Use/Arch:	PROPN_FRONT_POSS ;


LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_NONSTD

+Sg+Par+Err/Orth:%>ä	PROPN_FRONT_POSS_OPT ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ_ARCHAIC

+Sg+Par+Use/Arch:%>tä	PROPN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;



LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_NOMINATIVE

+Sg+Nom:	PROPN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PROPN_BACK_NOMINATIVE

+Sg+Nom:	PROPN_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN

+Px3:%>än	PROPN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Px3+Use/Arch:%>hän	PROPN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;



LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_POSS_OPT

:	PROPN_FRONT_POSS ;

:	PROPN_FRONT_CLIT ;

:	# ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN_ARCHAIC

+Pl+Gen+Use/Arch:%>ten	PROPN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Gen+Use/Arch:%>ten	PROPN_COMPOUND ;

+Pl+Gen+Use/Arch:%>te	PROPN_FRONT_POSS ;


LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_ESSIVE_NÄ_ARCHAIC

+Sg+Ess+Use/Arch:%>nä	PROPN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;


LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_ESSIVE_SÄ_ARCHAIC

+Sg+Ess+Use/Arch:%>sä	PROPN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;


+Pl+Abe:%>i%>tta	PROPN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Pl+Abl:%>i%>lta	PROPN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ade:%>i%>lla	PROPN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Pl+All:%>i%>lle	PROPN_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ela:%>i%>sta	PROPN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ine:%>i%>ssa	PROPN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ins:%>i%>n	PROPN_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Tra:%>i%>kse	PROPN_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL ;

+Pl+Tra:%>i%>ksi	PROPN_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PROPN_BACK_POSS_OPT

:	PROPN_BACK_POSS ;

:	PROPN_BACK_CLIT ;

:	# ;


LEXICON PROPN_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT

:	PROPN_BACK_POSS ;

:	PROPN_BACK_POSS_EN ;

:	PROPN_BACK_CLIT ;

:	# ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_POSS_EN_CLIT_OBL

:	PROPN_BACK_POSS ;

:	PROPN_BACK_POSS_EN ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT

:	PROPN_BACK_POSS ;

:	PROPN_BACK_POSS_AN ;

:	PROPN_BACK_CLIT ;

:	# ;


LEXICON PROPN_BACK_PLURALS

:	PROPN_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;

:	PROPN_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS ;



LEXICON PROPN_BACK_PLNOM_POSS

+Pl+Nom:	PROPN_BACK_POSS ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA_ARCHAIC

+Sg+Par+Use/Arch:%>ta	PROPN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_NONSTD

+Sg+Par+Err/Orth:%>a	PROPN_BACK_POSS_OPT ;


LEXICON PROPN_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN_ARCHAIC

+Pl+Gen+Use/Arch:%>ten	PROPN_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Gen+Use/Arch:%>ten	PROPN_COMPOUND ;

+Pl+Gen+Use/Arch:%>te	PROPN_BACK_POSS ;


LEXICON PROPN_BACK_ESSIVE_NA_ARCHAIC

+Sg+Ess+Use/Arch:%>na	PROPN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;


LEXICON PROPN_BACK_ESSIVE_SA_ARCHAIC

+Sg+Ess+Use/Arch:%>sa	PROPN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_DERIV_ITTAIN
+Pl+Der/tse:itse    #     ;
+Pl+Der/ttain:ittain  #     ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS

+Pl+Nom:0  PROPN_BACK_POSS_AN_CLIT_OPT   ;

+Pl+Abe:%>i%>tta	PROPN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Pl+Abl:%>i%>lta	PROPN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ade:%>i%>lla	PROPN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Pl+All:%>i%>lle	PROPN_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ela:%>i%>sta	PROPN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ine:%>i%>ssa	PROPN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ins:%>i%>n	PROPN_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Tra:%>i%>kse	PROPN_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL ;

+Pl+Tra:%>i%>ksi	PROPN_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
